Washington statutes.
RCW 35.07.180

Receiver—Power to levy taxes.

In the same manner and to the same extent as the proper authorities of the former city or town could have done had it not been disincorporated, the receiver shall be authorized to levy taxes on all taxable property, to receive the taxes when collected and to apply them together with the proceeds arising from sales to the extinguishment of the obligations of the former city or town.

After all the lawful claims against the former city or town have been paid excepting bonds not yet due, no levy greater than fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value shall be made; nor shall the levy be greater than sufficient to meet the accruing interest until the bonds mature.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 11; 1965 c 7 s 35.07.180. Prior: 1897 c 69 s 10, part; RRS s 8923, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.